Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB538.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2607 of Title 66 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding subsections to read:§ 2607. Rates and forms of compensation.* * *(g) Study.--(1) The Joint State Government Commission shall conduct a study on:(i) Income that drivers derive from operating personal vehicles for a transportation network company.(ii) Traffic congestion throughout the service area of a transportation network company and the extent to which a company's vehicles contribute to the congestion.(iii) Traffic safety.123456789101112131415161718 (iv) Vehicle utilization rates.(v) Access to the transportation network service in different geographic areas of this Commonwealth.(vi) The number of hours that drivers make themselves available to accept dispatches from a transportation network company by day or week.(vii) Driver incomes and well-being.(viii) Other topics that the Joint State Government Commission deems appropriate.(2) The Joint State Government Commission may require a transportation network company to provide the following data:(i) For each prearranged ride that is provided through the transportation network company:(A) The driver's license number of the driver.(B) The license plate number of the vehicle that fulfilled the prearranged ride request.(C) The location where a passenger is picked up and subsequently dropped off.(D) The total number of passengers picked up and dropped off from the location referenced in clause (C).(E) The date and time a passenger is picked up and dropped off.(F) The total ride mileage of a prearranged ride.(G) The date and time a prearranged ride request was made by a passenger.(H) The itemized fare for each prearranged ride, including the amount of the fare, tolls, surcharges, rates, other deductions, gratuity and a breakdown of 20250SB0538PN0524 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the amount a passenger paid for the prearranged ride.(I) The payment that a driver received for a prearranged ride or the hourly rate paid.(ii) The total amount of time that a vehicle is connected to the electronic platform of a transportation network company each day.(iii) The amount of time spent each day by a driver:(A) Providing transportation network services.(B) On the way to a passenger.(C) Between prearranged rides but not on the way to a passenger.(iv) Additional information that the Joint State Government Commission requires to conduct the study.(3) Within 12 months of the effective date of this paragraph, the Joint State Government Commission shall submit a report on the study to the following entities:(i) The chairperson of the Pennsylvania Public Utility Commission.(ii) The Secretary of Transportation.(iii) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Consumer Protection and Professional Licensure Committee of the Senate.(iv) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Consumer Protection, Technology and Utilities Committee of the House of Representatives.(v) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Transportation Committee of the Senate. (vi) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Transportation Committee of the House of Representatives.(h) Minimum payments to drivers.--20250SB0538PN0524 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) Within six months of the issuance of the report under subsection (g), the commission shall by rule or order establish a method for determining the minimum payment that shall be paid to a transportation network company driver for a prearranged ride. In establishing a minimum payment method, the commission shall consider:(i) The duration and distance of the prearranged ride.(ii) The expenses of operation to the driver.(iii) Applicable vehicle utilization standard.(iv) Rates of fares.(v) The adequacy of a driver's income considered in relation to a driver's expenses.(2) A rule promulgated by the commission under this subsection shall not prevent payments to transportation network company drivers from being calculated on an hourly or weekly basis, or by another method, provided that the actual payments made to drivers are no less than the minimum payments determined in accordance with the method established by the commission under this subsection.(i) Minimum rates of fares.-- (1) Following issuance of the report under subsection (g), the commission shall determine if the establishment of a minimum rate of fare charged by a transportation network company would substantially alleviate problems identified in the study.(2) If the commission determines that a minimum rate of fare would substantially alleviate problems identified in the study, the commission shall, by rule or order, establish a minimum rate of fare for transportation network company 20250SB0538PN0524 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 services.(3) In setting a minimum rate of fare, the commission may consider:(i) The category of vehicle.(ii) The type of prearranged ride, including prearranged rides in which the vehicle is available for the transportation of two or more passengers.(iii) The rates of fare for other categories of vehicles carrying passengers for hire, including taxicabs.(iv) The location of the prearranged ride.(v) Other factors that the commission determines to be appropriate to achieve the intended result.(4) A minimum rate of fare may not include taxes, fees or surcharges imposed on prearranged rides made by a transportation network company.(5) If the commission establishes a minimum rate of fare under paragraph (2), the commission shall, on a periodic basis, but not less than once annually, review minimum rates of fare to determine whether an amendment of the minimum rates of fare are warranted or necessary to achieve the intended result.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0538PN0524 - 5 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223